Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6177XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 2248 Section 1. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 3 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 4 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and such other labor-services 5 duties assigned to the department or director. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.204, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The director, in consultation with the labor 9 commissioner, shall, at the time provided by law, make an 10 annual report to the governor setting forth in appropriate 11 form the business and expense of the division and department 12 under this subchapter for the preceding year, the number 13 of remedial actions taken under chapter 89A , the number of 14 disputes or violations processed by the division or department 15 and the disposition of the disputes or violations, and other 16 matters pertaining to the division or department under this 17 subchapter which that are of public interest, together with 18 recommendations for change or amendment of the laws in this 19 chapter and chapters 88 , 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 89B , 90A , 91A , 91C , 20 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and sections 85.67A and 85.68 , and the 21 recommendations, if any, shall be transmitted by the governor 22 to the first general assembly in session after the report is 23 filed. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 91F.1 Definitions. 25 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 26 requires: 27 1. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 28 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 29 2. âEmployeeâ means an individual employed for wages in this 30 state. 31 3. âEmployerâ means a person who employs ten or more 32 full-time employees in this state. 33 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 91F.2 Paid family and medical leave ââ 34 neonatal intensive care unit. 35 -1- LSB 6177XS (3) 91 je/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2248 An employer shall provide an employee who has a child 1 receiving inpatient care in a neonatal intensive care unit with 2 paid family and medical leave for the duration the child is 3 receiving care in the unit, up to twelve weeks. Such leave 4 shall be compensated at the same hourly rate or salary and 5 with the same benefits, including health care benefits, as the 6 employee normally earns during hours worked. 7 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 91F.3 Civil penalty. 8 An employer who violates section 91F.2 is liable to an 9 employee for back pay and any other equitable relief the court 10 deems appropriate, including attorney fees and costs. 11 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 91F.4 Enforcement. 12 The director shall have the authority to enforce this 13 chapter and investigate alleged violations of this chapter. 14 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 91F.5 Rules. 15 The director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 16 administer this chapter. 17